Illinois, session 104th, SB336.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Bowling Center Act is amended by changing 5Section 1 as follows: 6    (745 ILCS 41/1)7    Sec. 1. Short Title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Bowling Center Act.9(Source: P.A. 96-713, eff. 1-1-10.)